North Dakota statutes. TITLE 59 Trusts
CHAPTER 59-04 Administration of Trusts [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27]

59-04-01.
Procedure and administration of trusts. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1973, ch. 257, § 82.

59-04-02.
Commencement of trust proceedings. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-04-03.
Form of title in trust administration proceeding. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-04-04.
Requisites of petition. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-04-05.
Notice — Service. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1973, ch. 257, § 82.

59-04-06.
Requisites of notice of hearing. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1973, ch. 257, § 82.

59-04-07.
Notice of hearing — Form. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1973, ch. 257, § 82.

59-04-08.
Appearance — Waiver of notice — Admission of service. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-04-09.
Proof of service of notice of hearing and order. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1973, ch. 257, § 82.

59-04-10.
Effect of court orders. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-04-11.
Representation of minors and incompetents. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-04-12.
Resident agent. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1973, ch. 257, § 82.

59-04-13.
Adoption of orders and decrees of foreign courts. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1973, ch. 257, § 82.

59-04-14.
Bond of trustee. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 257, § 82.

59-04-15.
Powers and duties of trustee. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-04-16.
Hearing may be had on several accounts, reports, or petitions — Order allowing required. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-04-17.
Reports of trustee. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-04-18.
Removal of trustee. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-04-19.
Vacancy in trust. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-04-20.
Vouchers shall accompany account — Exception. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1991, ch. 695, § 3.

59-04-21.
Expenses and attorney’s fees allowed. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-04-22.
Subsequent notice and hearings — Procedure. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-04-23.
When court order required. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-04-24.
Correction of mistakes — Relief from default — Copy of record furnished. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-04-25.
Appeals. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-04-26.
Appeal — How taken. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-04-27.
Stay of proceedings. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-04-28.
Notice of appeal. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-04-29.
Procedure on appeal. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-04-30.
Transmission of record — Briefs. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

59-04-31.
Demand for change of judge — Disqualification of judge. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.